Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-717
Intersection paving bonds; tax authorized.

Any city of the second class or village is hereby authorized, annually, to levy a tax upon all the taxable property thereof, sufficient to pay the principal and interest of any intersection paving bonds issued by such municipality.

Laws 1921, c. 199, § 3, p. 721;

C.S.1922, § 4389;

C.S.1929, § 17-587;

R.S.1943, § 17-717.